California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 on which the operation will commence, discipline of which the instruction is a part, and a brief description of the equipment and facilities available. The foregoing information shall be supplemented by a copy of the agreement between the approved dental hygiene educational program or parent university, and the affiliated institution establishing the contractual relationship. Any change in the information initially provided to the dental hygiene board shall be communicated to the dental hygiene board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 34.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1943.

(a) The dental hygiene board may deny an application to take an examination for licensure as a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions at any time prior to licensure for any of the following reasons:

(1) The applicant committed an act that is a ground for license suspension or revocation under this code or that is a ground for the denial of licensure under Section 480.

(2) The applicant committed or aided and abetted the commission of any act for which a license is required under this chapter.

(3) Another state or territory suspended or revoked the license that it had issued to the applicant on a ground that constitutes a basis in this state for the suspension or revocation of licensure under this article.

(b) The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the dental hygiene board shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 35.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1944.

(a) The dental hygiene board shall establish by resolution the amount of the fees that relate to the licensing of a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, and a registered dental hygienist in extended functions. The fees established by dental hygiene board resolution in effect on June 30, 2009, as they relate to the licensure of registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienists in extended functions, shall remain in effect until modified by the dental hygiene board. The fees are subject to the following limitations:

(1) The application fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) The initial licensure fee shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150). 

(3) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental hygienist shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.

(4) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental hygienist in extended functions shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.

(5) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall not exceed the actual cost of administering the examination.

(6) The biennial renewal fee shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(7) The delinquency fee shall not exceed one-half of the renewal fee. Any delinquent license may be restored only upon payment of all fees, including the delinquency fee, and compliance with all other applicable requirements of this article.

(8) The fee for issuance of a duplicate license to replace one that is lost or destroyed, or in the event of a name change, shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) or one-half of the renewal fee, whichever is greater.

(9) The fee for certification of licensure shall not exceed one-half of the renewal fee.

(10) The fee for each curriculum review and feasibility study review for educational programs for dental hygienists
 who are not accredited by a dental hygiene board-approved agency shall not exceed two thousand one hundred dollars ($2,100).

(11) The fee for each review or approval of course requirements for licensure or procedures that require additional training shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

(12) The initial application and biennial fee for a provider of continuing education shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(13) The amount of fees payable in connection with permits issued under Section 1962 is as follows:

(A) The initial permit fee is an amount equal to the renewal fee for the applicant’s license to practice dental hygiene in effect on the
 last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued.

(B) If the permit will expire less than one year after its issuance, then the initial permit fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued.

(14) The fee for the dental hygiene board to conduct a site visit to educational programs for a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions to ensure compliance of educational program requirements shall not exceed the actual cost incurred by the dental hygiene board for cost recovery of site visit expenditures.

(15) The fee for a retired license shall not exceed one-half of the current license renewal fee.

(b) The renewal and delinquency fees shall be fixed by the dental hygiene board by resolution at not more than the current amount of the renewal fee for a license to practice under this article nor less than five dollars ($5).

(c) Fees fixed by the dental hygiene board by resolution pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(d) Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be collected by the dental hygiene board and deposited into the State Dental Hygiene Fund, which is hereby created. All money in this fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the
 annual Budget Act, shall be used to implement this article.

(e) No fees or charges other than those listed in this section shall be levied by the dental hygiene board in connection with the licensure of registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienists in extended functions.

(f) The fee for registration of an extramural dental facility shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(g) The fee for registration of a mobile dental hygiene unit shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(h) The biennial renewal fee for a mobile dental hygiene unit shall not exceed two hundred fifty
 dollars ($250).

(i) The fee for an additional office permit shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(j) The biennial renewal fee for an additional office as described in Section 1926.4 shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(k) The initial application and biennial special permit fee is an amount equal to the biennial renewal fee specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a).

(l) The fees in this section shall not exceed an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory cost of carrying out this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 9.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1947.

A license issued under this article and a license issued under this chapter to a registered dental hygienist, to a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or to a registered dental hygienist in extended functions may be revoked or suspended by the dental hygiene board for any reason specified in this article for the suspension or revocation of a license to practice dental hygiene.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 37.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1949.

A licensee may have their license revoked or suspended, or may be reprimanded or placed on probation by the dental hygiene board for unprofessional conduct, incompetence, gross negligence, repeated acts of negligence in the licensee’s profession, receiving a license by mistake, or for any other cause applicable to the licentiate provided in this article. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the dental hygiene board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 38.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1950.

(a) A licensee may have their license revoked or suspended, or may be reprimanded or placed on probation by the dental hygiene board, for conviction of a crime substantially related to the licensee’s qualifications, functions, or duties. The record of conviction or a copy certified by the clerk of the court or by the judge in whose court the conviction occurred shall be conclusive evidence of conviction.

(b) The dental hygiene board shall undertake proceedings under this section upon the receipt of a certified copy of the record of conviction. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of a felony or of any misdemeanor
 substantially related to the licensee’s qualifications, functions, or duties is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(c) The dental hygiene board may reprimand a licensee or order a license suspended or revoked, or placed on probation or may decline to issue a license, when any of the following occur:

(1) The time for appeal has elapsed.

(2) The judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal.

(3) An order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under any provision of the Penal Code, including, but not limited to, Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, allowing a person to withdraw their
 plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 39.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1950.5.

Unprofessional conduct by a person licensed under this article is defined as, but is not limited to, any one of the following:

(a) The obtaining of any fee by fraud or misrepresentation.

(b) The aiding or abetting of any unlicensed person to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.

(c) The aiding or abetting of a licensed person to practice dentistry or dental hygiene unlawfully.

(d) The committing of any act or acts of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient that are substantially related to the practice of
 dental hygiene.

(e) The use of any false, assumed, or fictitious name, either as an individual, firm, corporation, or otherwise, or any name other than the name under which the person is licensed to practice, in advertising or in any other manner indicating that the person is practicing or will practice dentistry, except the name specified in a valid permit issued pursuant to Section 1962.

(f) The practice of accepting or receiving any commission or the rebating in any form or manner of fees for professional services, radiographs, prescriptions, or other services or articles supplied to patients.

(g) The making use by the licensee or any agent of the licensee of any advertising statements of a character tending to deceive
 or mislead the public.

(h) The advertising of either professional superiority or the advertising of performance of professional services in a superior manner. This subdivision shall not prohibit advertising permitted by subdivision (h) of Section 651.

(i) The employing or the making use of solicitors.

(j) Advertising in violation of Section 651.

(k) Advertising to guarantee any dental hygiene service, or to perform any dental hygiene procedure painlessly. This subdivision shall not prohibit advertising permitted by Section 651.

(l) The violation of any of the provisions of this division.

(m) The permitting of any person to operate dental radiographic equipment who has not met the requirements to do so, as determined by the dental hygiene board.

(n) The clearly excessive administering of drugs or treatment, or the clearly excessive use of treatment procedures, or the clearly excessive use of treatment facilities, as determined by the customary practice and standards of the dental hygiene profession.

Any person who violates this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than 60 days or more than 180 days, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

(o) The use of threats or harassment against any patient or licensee for providing evidence in any possible or actual disciplinary action, or other legal action; or the discharge of an employee primarily based on the employee’s attempt to comply with the provisions of this chapter or to aid in the compliance.

(p) Suspension or revocation of a license issued, or discipline imposed, by another state or territory on grounds that would be the basis of discipline in this state.

(q) The alteration of a patient’s record with intent to deceive.

(r) Unsanitary or unsafe office conditions, as determined by the customary practice and standards of the dental hygiene profession.

(s) The abandonment of the patient by the licensee, without written notice to the patient that treatment is to be discontinued and before the patient has ample opportunity to secure the services of another registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions and provided the health of the patient is not jeopardized.

(t) The willful misrepresentation of facts relating to a disciplinary action to the patients of a disciplined licensee.

(u) Use of fraud in the procurement of any license issued pursuant to this article.

(v) Any action or conduct that would have warranted the denial of
 the license.

(w) The aiding or abetting of a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions to practice dental hygiene in a negligent or incompetent manner.

(x) The failure to report to the dental hygiene board in writing within seven days any of the following: (1) the death of the licensee’s patient during the performance of any dental hygiene procedure; (2) the discovery of the death of a patient whose death is related to a dental hygiene procedure performed by the licensee; or (3) except for a scheduled hospitalization, the removal to a hospital or emergency center for medical treatment for a period exceeding 24 hours of any patient as a result of dental or dental hygiene treatment. Upon
 receipt of a report pursuant to this subdivision, the dental hygiene board may conduct an inspection of the dental hygiene practice office if the dental hygiene board finds that it is necessary.

(y) A registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions shall report to the dental hygiene board all deaths occurring in their practice with a copy sent to the dental board if the death occurred while working as an employee in a dental office. A dentist shall report to the dental board all deaths occurring in their practice with a copy sent to the dental hygiene board if the death was the result of treatment by a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions.

(z) Knowingly making a statement or signing a certificate or other document that falsely represents the existence or nonexistence of a fact directly or indirectly related to the practice of dental hygiene.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 491, Sec. 6.   (SB 534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1951.

The dental hygiene board may discipline a licensee by placing the licensee on probation under various terms and conditions that may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Requiring the licensee to obtain additional training in a remedial education course approved by the dental hygiene board or pass an examination upon completion of training in a remedial education course approved by the dental hygiene board, or both. The examination may be a written or oral examination, or both, and may be a practical or clinical examination, or both, at the option of the dental hygiene board.

(b) Requiring the licensee to submit to a complete
 diagnostic
 examination by one or more physicians appointed by the dental hygiene board, if warranted by the physical or mental condition of the licensee. If the dental hygiene board requires the licensee to submit to an examination, the dental hygiene board shall receive and consider any other report of a complete diagnostic examination given by one or more physicians of the licensee’s choice.

(c) Restricting or limiting the extent, scope, or type of practice of the licensee.

(d) Requiring restitution of fees to the licensee’s patients or payers of services, unless restitution has already been made.

(e) Providing the option of alternative community service in lieu of all or part of a period of suspension in cases other than
 violations relating to quality of care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 491, Sec. 7.   (SB 534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.

It is unprofessional conduct for a person licensed under this article to do any of the following:

(a) Obtain or possess in violation of law, or except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist, a controlled substance, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022.

(b) Use a controlled substance, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or a dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022, or alcoholic beverages or other intoxicating substances, to an extent or in a manner
 dangerous or injurious to themselves, to any person, or the public to the extent that the use impairs the licensee’s ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by their license.

(c) Be convicted of a charge of violating any federal statute or rules, or any statute or rule of this state, regulating controlled substances, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022, or be convicted of more than one misdemeanor, or any felony, involving the use or consumption of alcohol or drugs, if the conviction is substantially related to the practice authorized by their license.

(1) The record of conviction or a copy certified by the clerk of the court or by the judge in
 whose court the conviction is had, shall be conclusive evidence of a violation of this section. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(2) The dental hygiene board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under any provision of the Penal Code, including, but not limited to, Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, allowing a person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or
 indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 42.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.

(a) A registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions who performs a service on a patient in a dental office shall identify himself or herself in the patient record by signing his or her name or identification number and initials next to the service performed, and shall date those treatment entries in the record.

(b) A repeated violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.

(a) It is unprofessional conduct for a person licensed under this article to perform, or hold himself or herself out as able to perform, professional services beyond the scope of his or her license and field of competence, as established by his or her education, experience, and training. This includes, but is not limited to, using an instrument or device in a manner that is not in accordance with the customary standards and practices of the dental hygiene profession.

(b) This section shall not apply to research conducted by accredited dental schools or dental hygiene schools, or to research conducted pursuant to an investigational device exemption issued by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1955.

(a) (1) A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a request for a patient’s dental or dental hygiene records that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of the records to the dental hygiene board, within 15 days of receiving the request and authorization, shall pay to the dental hygiene board a civil or administrative penalty or fine up to a maximum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the 15th day, up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) unless the licensee is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause.

(2) A health care
 facility shall comply with a request for the dental or dental hygiene records of a patient that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of records to the dental hygiene board together with a notice citing this section and describing the penalties for failure to comply with this section. Failure to provide the authorizing patient’s dental hygiene records to the dental hygiene board within 30 days of receiving this request, authorization, and notice shall subject the health care facility to a civil or administrative penalty or fine, payable to the dental hygiene board, of up to a maximum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the 30th day, up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), unless the health care facility is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause. This paragraph
 shall not require health care facilities to assist the dental hygiene board in obtaining the patient’s authorization. The dental hygiene board shall pay the reasonable cost of copying the dental hygiene records.

(b) (1) A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a court order issued in the enforcement of a subpoena mandating the release of records to the dental hygiene board shall pay to the dental hygiene board a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the date by which the court order requires the documents to be produced, unless it is determined that the order is unlawful or invalid. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the dental hygiene board shall be tolled during the period the licensee is out of
 compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(2) A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a court order issued in the enforcement of a subpoena mandating the release of records to the dental hygiene board is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine payable to the dental hygiene board not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The fine shall be added to the licensee’s renewal fee if it is not paid by the next succeeding renewal date. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the dental hygiene board shall be tolled during the period the licensee is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(3) A health care facility that fails or refuses to comply with a court order issued in the
 enforcement of a subpoena mandating the release of patient records to the dental hygiene board, that is accompanied by a notice citing this section and describing the penalties for failure to comply with this section, shall pay to the dental hygiene board a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), after the date by which the court order requires the documents to be produced, unless it is determined that the order is unlawful or invalid. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the dental hygiene board against a licensee shall be tolled during the period the health care facility is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(4) A health care facility that fails or
 refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the dental hygiene board is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine payable to the dental hygiene board not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the dental hygiene board against a licensee shall be tolled during the period the health care facility is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(c) Multiple acts by a licensee in violation of subdivision (b) shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Multiple acts by a health care facility in violation of subdivision (b) shall be punishable
 by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall be reported to the State Department of Public Health and shall be considered as grounds for disciplinary action with respect to licensure, including suspension or revocation of the license or permit.

(d) A failure or refusal to comply with a court order issued in the enforcement of a subpoena mandating the release of records to the dental hygiene board constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for suspension or revocation of the person’s license.

(e) Imposition of the civil or administrative penalties authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(f) For the purposes of this section, a “health care facility” means a clinic or health care facility licensed or exempt from licensure pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 43.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1956.

It is unprofessional conduct for a person licensed under this article to require, either directly or through an office policy, or knowingly permit the delivery of dental hygiene care that discourages necessary treatment, or permits clearly excessive, incompetent, unnecessary, or grossly negligent treatment, or repeated negligent acts, as determined by the standard of practice in the community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1957.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked or suspended, who has been placed on probation, or whose license was surrendered pursuant to a stipulated settlement as a condition to avoid a disciplinary administrative hearing, may petition the dental hygiene board for reinstatement or modification of the penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period of not less than the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license revoked for unprofessional conduct or surrendered pursuant to a stipulated settlement as a condition to avoid an
 administrative disciplinary hearing.

(2) At least two years for early termination, or modification of a condition, of a probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination, or modification of a condition, of a probation of less than three years.

(b) The petition shall state any fact required by the dental hygiene board.

(c) The petition may be heard by the dental hygiene board, or the dental hygiene board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code.

(d) In considering reinstatement or modification or penalty, the dental hygiene board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider the following:

(1) All activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken.

(2) The offense for which the petitioner was disciplined.

(3) The petitioner’s activities during the time the license or permit was in good standing.

(4) The petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability.

(e) The hearing may be continued from time to time
 as the dental hygiene board or the administrative law judge as designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code finds necessary.

(f) The dental hygiene board or the administrative law judge may impose necessary terms and conditions on the licentiate in reinstating a license or permit or modifying a penalty.

(g) A petition shall not be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole.

(h) A petition shall not be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the person.

(i) The dental hygiene board
 may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter Sections 822 and 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 44.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1958.

A person, company, or association is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not less than 10 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or by both that fine and imprisonment, who does any of the following:

(a) Assumes the title of “registered dental hygienist,” “registered dental hygienist in alternative practice,” or “registered dental hygienist in extended functions” or appends the letters “R.D.H.,” “R.D.H.A.P.,” or “R.D.H.E.F.” to the person’s name without having had the right to assume the title conferred upon the person through licensure.

(b) Assumes any title, or appends any letters to the person’s name, with the intent to represent falsely that the person has received a dental hygiene degree or a license under this article.

(c) Engages in the practice of dental hygiene without causing to be displayed in a conspicuous place in the person’s office the person’s license under this article to practice dental hygiene.

(d) Within 10 days after demand is made by the executive officer of the dental hygiene board, fails to furnish to the dental hygiene board the name and address of all persons practicing or assisting in the practice of dental hygiene in the office of the person, company, or association, at any time within 60 days prior to the demand, together with a
 sworn statement showing under and by what license or authority this person, company, or association and any employees are or have been practicing or assisting in the practice of dental hygiene. This sworn statement shall not be used in any prosecution under this section.

(e) Is under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance while engaged in the practice of dental hygiene in actual attendance on patients to an extent that impairs the licensee’s ability to conduct the practice of dental hygiene with safety to patients and the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 45.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1958.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, with regard to an individual who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code, or the equivalent in another state or territory, under military law, or under federal law, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The dental hygiene board shall deny an application by the individual for licensure pursuant to this article.

(2) If the individual is licensed under this article, the dental hygiene board shall promptly revoke the license of the individual. The dental hygiene board shall not stay the revocation nor place the license on probation.

(3) The dental hygiene board shall not reinstate or reissue the individual’s licensure under this article. The dental hygiene board shall not issue a stay of license denial and place the license on probation.

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) An individual who has been relieved under Section 290.5 of the Penal Code of the individual’s duty to register as a sex offender, or whose duty to register has otherwise been formally terminated under California law or the law of the jurisdiction that requires the individual’s registration as a sex offender.

(2) An individual who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290
 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code. However, nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the dental hygiene board from exercising its discretion to discipline a licensee under other provisions of state law based upon the licensee’s conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.

(3) Any administrative adjudication proceeding under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that is fully adjudicated prior to January 1, 2013. A petition for reinstatement of a revoked or surrendered license shall be considered a new proceeding for purposes of this paragraph, and the prohibition against reinstating a license to an individual who is required to register as a sex offender shall be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 46.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1959.

A person who holds a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended license as a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions under this article may append the letters “R.D.H.,” “R.D.H.A.P.,” or “R.D.H.E.F.,” respectively, to his or her name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 13.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1960.

For the first offense, a person is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not to exceed six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment, and for the second or a subsequent offense is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than six thousand dollars ($6,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment, who does any of the following:

(a) Sells or barters or offers to sell or barter a dental
 hygiene degree or transcript or a license issued under, or purporting to be issued under, laws regulating licensure of registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienists in extended functions.

(b) Purchases or procures by barter a diploma, license, or transcript with intent that it shall be used as evidence of the holder’s qualification to practice dental hygiene, or in fraud of the laws regulating the practice of dental hygiene.

(c) With fraudulent intent, makes, attempts to make, counterfeits, or materially alters a diploma, certificate, or transcript.

(d) Uses, or attempts or causes to be used, any diploma, certificate, or transcript that has been purchased, fraudulently issued, counterfeited, or materially altered or in order to procure licensure as
 a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions.

(e) In an affidavit required of an applicant for an examination or license under this article, willfully makes a false statement in a material regard.

(f) Practices dental hygiene or offers to practice dental hygiene, as defined in this article, either without a license, or when his or her license has been revoked or suspended.

(g) Under any false, assumed or fictitious name, either as an individual, firm, corporation or otherwise, or any name other than the name under which he or she is licensed, practices, advertises, or in any other manner indicates that he or she practices or will practice dental hygiene, except a name specified in a valid permit issued pursuant to Section
 1962.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 10.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1961.

A person who willfully, under circumstances that cause risk of bodily harm, serious physical or mental illness, or death, practices, attempts to practice, advertises, or holds himself or herself out as practicing dental hygiene without having at the time of so doing a valid, unrevoked, and unsuspended license as provided in this article, is guilty of a crime, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for up to one year. The remedy provided in this section shall not preclude any other remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 14.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1962.

(a) An association, partnership, corporation, or group of three or more registered dental hygienists in alternative practice engaging in practice under a name that would otherwise be in violation of Section 1960 may practice under that name if the association, partnership, corporation, or group holds an unexpired, unsuspended, and unrevoked permit issued by the dental hygiene board under this section.
